Alabama, session 2026rs, SB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 13A-12-213 and 13A-12-214, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§13A-12-213
(a) A person commits the crime of unlawful possession
of marihuana marijuana in the first degree if he or she
possesses one or more ounces of marijuana, except as otherwise
authorized:
(1) He or she possesses marihuana for other than
Page 2

(1) He or she possesses marihuana for other than
SB285 INTRODUCED
personal use; or
(2) He or she possesses marihuana for his or her
personal use only after having been previously convicted of
unlawful possession of marihuana in the second degree or
unlawful possession of marihuana for his or her personal use
only.
(b) Unlawful possession of marihuana marijuana in the
first degree pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) is
a Class C felony. is punishable as follows:
(1) Upon a first conviction of this section within the
preceding five years, the person is guilty of a Class C
misdemeanor, punishable only by a fine not to exceed two
hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(2) Upon a second conviction of this section within the
preceding five years, the person is guilty of a Class C
misdemeanor, punishable only by a fine not to exceed five
hundred dollars ($500).
(3) Upon a third or subsequent conviction of this
section within the preceding five years, the person is guilty
of a Class D felony, punishable only by a fine not to exceed
seven hundred fifty dollars ($750)
(c) Unlawful possession of marihuana in the first
degree pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) is a
Class D felony.All fines and forfeitures collected upon
conviction or upon forfeiture of bail of any person charged
with a violation of this section shall be deposited into the
State Treasury to the credit of the State General Fund.
(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 27 of Title 15, a person
Page 3

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 27 of Title 15, a person
SB285 INTRODUCED
who has been charged with, found not guilty of, or convicted
of violating this section may file a petition in the criminal
division of any circuit court to expunge records related to
the charge, finding, or conviction when the person has not
been convicted of any other felony, misdemeanor, or violation,
excluding minor traffic violations, during the previous five
years. Upon the granting of a petition, the court shall order
the expungement of all records of the person as provided in
Section 15-27-6."
"§13A-12-214
(a) A person commits the crime of unlawful possession
of marihuana marijuana in the second degree if, except as
otherwise authorized, he or she possesses marihuana for his
personal use only less than one ounce of marijuana.
(b) Unlawful possession of marihuana marijuana in the
100 second degree is a Class A misdemeanor violation punishable
101 only by a fine not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200).
102 (c) A violation of this section alone shall not be
103 accompanied by a charge pursuant to Section 13A-12-260.
104 (d) All fines and forfeitures collected upon conviction
105 or upon forfeiture of bail of any person charged with a
106 violation of this section shall be deposited into the State
107 Treasury to the credit of the State General Fund.
108 (e) Notwithstanding Chapter 27 of Title 15, a person
109 who has been charged with, found not guilty of, or convicted
110 of violating this section may file a petition in the criminal
111 division of any circuit court to expunge records related to
112 the charge, finding, or conviction when the person has not
Page 4

the charge, finding, or conviction when the person has not
SB285 INTRODUCED
113 been convicted of any other felony, misdemeanor, or violation,
114 excluding minor traffic violations, during the previous five
115 years. Upon the granting of a petition, the court shall order
116 the expungement of all records of the person as provided in
117 Section 15-27-6."
118 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
119 1, 2026.
Page 5